Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1701
Acts, proceedings, and appropriations; validation.

Any acts and proceedings undertaken or funds appropriated in accordance with and pursuant to Laws 1991, LB 511, and prior to April 16, 1992, are hereby deemed undertaken pursuant to Laws 1992, LB 245, legalized, and validated if in compliance with Laws 1991, LB 511.

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 96;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,240;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1011.